Idaho, session 2026, H0697.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 18-2306, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 2. That Chapter 23, Title 18, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 18-2306, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
18-2306. ILLEGAL VOTING. Every person not entitled to vote who fraudu-
lently votes and every person who votes more than once at any one (1) election
or knowingly hands in two (2) or more tickets folded together shall be guilty
of a felony.
SECTION 3. That Chapter 23, Title 18, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 18-2306A, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
18-2306A. INTERFERENCE WITH ELECTION. (1) Every person who changes
any ballot after the same has been deposited in the ballot box, or who adds,
or attempts to add, any ballot to those legally polled at any election, ei-
ther by fraudulently introducing the same into the ballot box before or after
the ballots therein have been counted, or by adding to or mixing with, or
attempting to add to or mix with, the ballots lawfully polled, other ballots,
while the same are being counted or canvassed, or at any other time, with
intent to change the result of such election shall be guilty of a felony.
(2) Every person who carries away or destroys, or attempts to carry away
or destroy, any poll list, ballots, or ballot box, for the purpose of break-
ing up or invalidating such election, or who willfully detains, mutilates,
or destroys any election returns, or who in any manner so interferes with the
officers holding such election or conducting such canvass or with the voters
lawfully exercising their rights of voting at such election, as to prevent


such election or canvass from being fairly held and lawfully conducted shall
be guilty of a felony.
SECTION 4. That Chapter 23, Title 18, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 18-2306B, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
18-2306B. TAMPERING WITH VOTING MACHINES OR VOTE TALLY SYSTEMS. Every
person who violates the provisions of section 34-2404(1) or (2), Idaho Code,
by tampering with a voting machine or vote tally system shall be guilty of a
felony.
SECTION 5. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.